hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex-special/spechyph-ot1-da.tex
\begingroup

% OT1 encoding: we have to specify a value for the \aa letter; it can
% be any value (it will not be used, since OT1 doesn't contain the letter).
% "E5 (T1) or "97 ("arbitrary" number used in old patterns)

\catcode"C3=\active
%
\def^^c3#1{%
	\ifx#1^^a5^^97\else % å - U+00E5 - aring
	\ifx#1^^a6^^1a\else % æ - U+00E6 - ae
	\ifx#1^^b8^^1c\else % ø - U+00F8 - oslash
	\errmessage{Hyphenation pattern file corrupted or OT1 encoding not supported!}
\fi\fi\fi}

%
% ensure all the chars above have valid lccode values
%
\lccode"1A="1A % æ - U+00E6 - ae
\lccode"1C="1C % ø - U+00F8 - oslash
\lccode"97="97 % å - U+00E5 - aring

\patterns{
.så3
.ær5i
.øv3r
a3tø
a5væ
brød3
5bæ
5drøv
dstå4
3dæ
3dø
e3læ
e3lø
e3rø
er5øn
e5tæ
e5tø
e1væ
e3æ
e5å
3fæ
3fø
fø4r5en
giø4
g4sø
g5så
3gæ
3gø1
3gå
i5tæ
i3ø
3kø
3kå
lingeniø4
l3væ
5løs
m5tå
1mæ
3mø
3må
n3kæ
n5tæ
3næ
4n5æb
5nø
o5læ
or3ø
o5å
5præ
5pæd
på3
r5kæ
r5tæ
r5tø
r3væ
r5æl
4røn
5rør
3råd
r5år
s4kå
3slå
s4næ
5stø
1stå
1sæ
4s5æn
1sø
s5øk
så4r5
ti4ø
3træk.
t4sø
t5så
t3væ
u3læ
3værd
1værk
5vå
y5væ
æb3l
æ3c
æ3e
æg5a
æ4gek
æ4g5r
ægs5
æ5i
æ5kv
ælle4
æn1dr
æ5o
æ1re
ær4g5r
æ3ri
ær4ma
ær4mo
ær5s
æ5si
æ3so
æ3ste
æ3ve
øde5
ø3e
ø1je
ø3ke
ø3le
øms5
øn3st
øn4t3
ø1re
ø3ri
ørne3
ør5o
ø1ve
å1d
å1e
å5h
å3l
å3re
års5t
å5sk
å3t
}
\endgroup
